Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB809.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8902(a)(1) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 8902. Exemption.(a) General rule.--Any resident of this Commonwealth shall be exempt from the payment of all real estate taxes levied upon any building, including the land upon which it stands, occupied by that person as a principal dwelling, if all of the following requirements are met:(1) That person has been honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from the armed forces of the United States [for service in any war or armed conflict in which this nation was engaged].1234567891011121314151617 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0809PN0854 - 2 - 12